North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-01 Definitions and General Provisions
“Included and excluded service”. If the service performed during one-half or more of any pay period by an individual for the person employing the individual constitutes employment, all the services of such individual for such period must be deemed to be employment, but if the service performed during more than one-half of any such pay period by an individual for the person employing the individual does not constitute employment, then none of the services of such individual for such period may be deemed to be employment. As used in this subsection, the term “pay period” means a period, of not more than thirty-one consecutive days, for which a payment of remuneration ordinarily is made to the individual by the person employing the individual. This subsection is not applicable with respect to services performed in a pay period by an individual for the person employing the individual, when any of such service is excepted by subdivision h of subsection 18.

“Institution of higher education”, for the purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, means an educational institution which:

Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school or the recognized equivalent of such a certificate;

Is legally authorized in this state to provide a program of education beyond high school;

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor’s or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of postgraduate or postdoctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation; and

Is a public or other nonprofit institution.

“Localized service”. Service must be deemed to be localized within a state if:

The service is performed entirely within such state; or

The service is performed both within and without such state, but the service performed without such state is incidental to the individual’s service within the state, for example, is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions.

“State” includes, in addition to the states of the United States of America, Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and the Virgin Islands.

“Unemployed”. An individual is “unemployed” with respect to any week during which the individual performs no services and with respect to which no wages are payable to the individual, or with respect to any week during which the individual is substantially unemployed and the wages payable to the individual with respect to such week are less than the individual’s weekly benefit amount. For the purposes of this subsection, wages are payable with respect to the weeks for which they were reasonably intended to be payable, irrespective of whether services were performed in those weeks. The bureau shall prescribe regulations applicable to unemployed individuals making such distinctions in the procedures as to total unemployment, part-total unemployment, partial unemployment of individuals attached to their regular jobs, and other forms of work, as the bureau deems necessary.

“Wages” means all remuneration for service from whatever source, including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all remuneration in any medium other than cash. Gratuities customarily received by an individual in the course of the individual’s service from persons other than the individual’s employing unit must be treated as wages received from the individual’s employing unit. After January 1, 1951, backpay awarded under any statute of this state or of the United States must be treated as wages. The reasonable cash value of remuneration in any medium other than cash, and the reasonable amount of gratuities, must be estimated and determined in accordance with rules as prescribed by the bureau. For the purpose of a determination of insured status only, backpay awards after January 1, 1951, must be allocated to the quarters with respect to which they were paid. If the remuneration of an individual is not based upon a fixed period or duration of time or if the individual’s wages are paid at irregular intervals or in such manner as not to extend regularly over a period of employment, for the purposes of a determination of insured status only, the wages must be allocated to weeks or quarters in accordance with regulations prescribed by the bureau. Such regulations must, so far as possible, produce results reasonably similar to those which would prevail if the individual were paid the individual’s wages at regular intervals. The term “wages” does not include:

The amount of any payment made after January 1, 1951, including any amount paid by an employing unit for insurance or annuities, or into a fund, to provide for any such payment to, or on behalf of, an individual or any of the individual’s dependents under a plan or system established by an employing unit which makes provision generally for individuals performing service for it or for such individuals generally and their dependents or for a class or classes of such individuals, or for a class or classes of such individuals and their dependents, on account of:

Sickness or accident disability but, in the case of payments made to an employee or any of the employee’s dependents, this paragraph excludes from the term “wages” only payments which are received under a workforce safety and insurance law;

Medical and hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability; or

Death.

The amount of any payment on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident disability, made after January 1, 1951, by an employing unit to, or on behalf of, an individual performing services for it after the expiration of six calendar months following the last calendar month in which the individual performed services for such employing unit.

The amount of any payment made after January 1, 1951, by an employing unit to, or on behalf of, an individual performing services for it or the individual’s beneficiary:

From or to a trust described in section 401(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code which is exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code at the time of such payment unless such payment is made to an individual performing services for the trust as remuneration for such services and not as a beneficiary of the trust; or

Under or to an annuity plan which, at the time of such payments, is a plan described in section 403(a) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

The amount of any payment made by an employing unit, without deduction from the remuneration of the individual in its employ, of the tax imposed upon an individual in its employ under section 3101 of the federal Internal Revenue Code with respect to services performed after January 1, 1951.

Remuneration paid after January 1, 1951, in any medium other than cash to an individual for services not in the course of the employing unit’s trade or business.

Dismissal payments before December 31, 1951, which the employing unit legally is not required to make.

Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or the employee’s beneficiary under or to an annuity contract described in section 403(b) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, other than a payment for the purchase of such contract which is made by reason of a salary reduction agreement whether evidenced by a written instrument or otherwise, under or to an exempt governmental deferred compensation plan as defined in section 3121(v)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or to supplemental pension benefits under a plan or trust described in any of the foregoing provisions to take into account some portion or all of the increase in the cost of living as determined by the secretary of labor since retirement but only if such supplemental payments are under a plan which is treated as a welfare plan under section 3(2)(B)(ii) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.

Any payment made to, or on behalf of, an employee or the employee’s beneficiary under a simplified employee pension if, at the time of the payment, it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be entitled to a deduction under section 219(b)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code for such payment.

The value of any meals or lodging furnished by or on behalf of the employer if at the time of such furnishing it is reasonable to believe that the employee will be able to exclude such items from income under section 119 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Nothing in this subsection excludes from the term “wages” any employer contribution under a qualified cash or deferred arrangement as defined in section 401(k) of the federal Internal Revenue Code to the extent not included in gross income by reason of section 402(a)(8) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, or any amount treated as an employer contribution under section 414(h)(2) of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Any amount deferred under a nonqualified deferred compensation plan must be taken into account for purposes of this chapter as of the later of when the services are performed, or when there is no substantial risk of forfeiture of the rights to such amount. Any amount taken into account as wages by reason of this subdivision and the income attributable thereto may not thereafter be treated as wages for purposes of this chapter. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “nonqualified deferred compensation plan” means any plan or other arrangement for deferral of compensation other than a plan described in subdivisions c, g, and h.

Payments that qualify as supplemental unemployment compensation paid by an employer to former employees if those payments are paid pursuant to a plan that meets the following requirements:

Benefits are paid only to unemployed former employees who are laid off by the employer;

Eligibility for benefits depends on meeting prescribed conditions after termination;

The amount of weekly benefits payable is based upon state unemployment benefits, other compensation allowable under state law, and the amount of regular weekly pay of that former employee;

The duration of the benefits is affected by the fund level and employee seniority;

The right to benefits does not accrue until a prescribed period after termination;

Benefits are not attributable to the performance of particular services;

No employee has any right to the benefits until qualified and eligible to receive benefits; and

Benefits may not be paid in a lump sum.

“Week” means such period of seven consecutive days, as the bureau may prescribe by regulation. The bureau by regulation may prescribe that a week must be deemed to be “in”, “within”, or “during” that benefit year which includes the greater part of such week.

For purposes
of this paragraph, the term “employment” includes services
described in either subparagraph a or b performed after December 31,
1971, only if the contract of service contemplates that substantially
all of the services are to be performed personally by such individual;
the individual does not have a substantial investment in facilities
used in connection with the performance of the services other than
in facilities for transportation; and the services are not in the
nature of a single transaction that is not part of a continuing relationship
with the person for whom the services are performed.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this subsection, all colleges and universities in this state are institutions of higher education for purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, §§ 2, 4; 1939, ch. 215, § 2; 1941, ch. 261, §§ 1, 2, subs. c, subd. 8(b), (c); R.C. 1943, § 52-0101; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 1; 1945, ch. 285, § 1; 1951, ch. 292; 1955, ch. 304, § 1; 1957, ch. 326, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0101; S.L. 1959, ch. 353, § 1; 1963, ch. 331, §§ 1 to 5; 1965, ch. 333, §§ 1, 2; 1967, ch. 371, § 1; 1971, ch. 475, §§ 1 to 4, 9 to 14, 19, 20; 1973, ch. 391, §§ 1 to 9, 16, 22, 26; 1975, ch. 455, § 1; 1975, ch. 456, § 1; 1977, ch. 458, § 1; 1977, ch. 459, §§ 1 to 10; 1977, ch. 460, § 1; 1977, ch. 461, § 1; 1979, ch. 522, § 1; 1979, ch. 526, § 1; 1981, ch. 501, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 535, § 1; 1985, ch. 543, § 1; 1985, ch. 544, § 1; 1989, ch. 594, § 1; 1989, ch. 595, § 1; 1989, ch. 596, § 1; 1989, ch. 597, § 1; 1991, ch. 533, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 534, § 1; 1991, ch. 535, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, §§ 94, 106; 1995, ch. 478, § 1; 1999, ch. 432, § 1; 2001, ch. 448, §§ 1, 2, 3; 2001, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 450, § 1; 2003, ch. 440, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 450, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 451, § 1; 2011, ch. 375, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011 became effective April 26, 2011, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2011.

Note.

Federal Internal Revenue Code, see USCS, Title 26.